test/src/morphology/all-pos-tests_gt-norm.yaml
  Adj - noere: # adj. on -e
    noere+A+Attr: noere
    noere+A+Sg+Nom: noere
    noere+A+Sg+Gen: noeren
    noere+A+Sg+Acc: noerem
    noere+A+Sg+Ill: noerese
    noere+A+Sg+Ine: noeresne
    noere+A+Sg+Ela: noereste
    noere+A+Sg+Com: noerine
    noere+A+Pl+Nom: [noereh, noerh]
    noere+A+Pl+Gen: noeri
    noere+A+Pl+Acc: noeride
    noere+A+Pl+Ill: noeride
    noere+A+Pl+Ine: noerine
    noere+A+Pl+Ela: noerijste
    noere+A+Pl+Com: noerigujmie
    noere+A+Ess: noerine
    noere+A+Comp+Attr: nuerebe
    noere+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: nuerebe
    noere+A+Comp+Sg+Gen: nuereben
    noere+A+Comp+Sg+Acc: nuerebem
    noere+A+Comp+Sg+Ill: nueriebasse
    noere+A+Comp+Sg+Ine: nueriebisnie
    noere+A+Comp+Sg+Ela: nueriebistie
    noere+A+Comp+Sg+Com: nueriebinie
    noere+A+Comp+Pl+Nom: nuerebh
    noere+A+Comp+Pl+Acc: nueriebidie
    noere+A+Comp+Pl+Gen: [nuerebi, nuerebij]
    noere+A+Comp+Pl+Ill: nueriebidie
    noere+A+Comp+Pl+Ine: nueriebinie
    noere+A+Comp+Pl+Ela: nueriebijstie
    noere+A+Comp+Pl+Com: nuerebigujmie
    noere+A+Comp+Ess: nueriebinie
    noere+A+Superl+Attr: nööremes
    noere+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: nööremes
    noere+A+Superl+Sg+Gen: nööremassen
    noere+A+Superl+Sg+Acc: nööremassem
    noere+A+Superl+Sg+Ill: nööremassese
    noere+A+Superl+Sg+Ine: nööremassesne
    noere+A+Superl+Sg+Ela: nööremasseste
    noere+A+Superl+Sg+Com: nööremassine
    noere+A+Superl+Pl+Nom: nööremessh
    noere+A+Superl+Pl+Acc: nööremasside
    noere+A+Superl+Pl+Gen: [nööremessi, nööremessij]
    noere+A+Superl+Pl+Ill: nööremasside
    noere+A+Superl+Pl+Ine: nööremassine
    noere+A+Superl+Pl+Ela: nööremassijste
    noere+A+Superl+Pl+Com: nööremassigujmie
    noere+A+Superl+Ess: nööremassine

  Adj - aelhkies: # Bisyll. adj. with s/-.
    aelhkies+A+Attr: aelhkies
    aelhkies+A+Sg+Nom: aelhkie
    aelhkies+A+Sg+Gen: aelhkien
    aelhkies+A+Sg+Acc: aelhkiem
    aelhkies+A+Sg+Ill: aalhkan
    aelhkies+A+Sg+Ine: aelhkesne
    aelhkies+A+Sg+Ela: aelhkeste
    aelhkies+A+Sg+Com: aelhkine
    aelhkies+A+Pl+Nom: aelhkieh
    aelhkies+A+Pl+Gen: aelhkiej
    aelhkies+A+Pl+Acc: aelhkide
    aelhkies+A+Pl+Ill: aelhkide
    aelhkies+A+Pl+Ine: aelhkine
    aelhkies+A+Pl+Ela: aelhkijste
    aelhkies+A+Pl+Com: aelhkiejgujmie
    aelhkies+A+Ess: aelhkine
    aelhkies+A+Comp+Attr: aelhkebe
    aelhkies+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: aelhkebe
    aelhkies+A+Comp+Sg+Gen: aelhkeben
    aelhkies+A+Comp+Sg+Acc: aelhkebem
    aelhkies+A+Comp+Sg+Ill: aelhkiebasse
    aelhkies+A+Comp+Sg+Ine: aelhkiebisnie
    aelhkies+A+Comp+Sg+Ela: aelhkiebistie
    aelhkies+A+Comp+Sg+Com: aelhkiebinie
    aelhkies+A+Comp+Pl+Nom: aelhkebh
    aelhkies+A+Comp+Pl+Acc: aelhkiebidie
    aelhkies+A+Comp+Pl+Gen: [aelhkebi, aelhkebij]
    aelhkies+A+Comp+Pl+Ill: aelhkiebidie
    aelhkies+A+Comp+Pl+Ine: aelhkiebinie
    aelhkies+A+Comp+Pl+Ela: aelhkiebijstie
    aelhkies+A+Comp+Pl+Com: aelhkebigujmie
    aelhkies+A+Comp+Ess: aelhkiebinie
    aelhkies+A+Superl+Attr: aelhkemes
    aelhkies+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: aelhkemes
    aelhkies+A+Superl+Sg+Gen: aelhkiemassen
    aelhkies+A+Superl+Sg+Acc: aelhkiemassem
    aelhkies+A+Superl+Sg+Ill: aelhkiemassese
    aelhkies+A+Superl+Sg+Ine: aelhkiemassesne
    aelhkies+A+Superl+Sg+Ela: aelhkiemasseste
    aelhkies+A+Superl+Sg+Com: aelhkiemassine
    aelhkies+A+Superl+Pl+Nom: aelhkiemessh
    aelhkies+A+Superl+Pl+Acc: aelhkiemasside
    aelhkies+A+Superl+Pl+Gen: [aelhkiemessi, aelhkiemessij]
    aelhkies+A+Superl+Pl+Ill: aelhkiemasside
    aelhkies+A+Superl+Pl+Ine: aelhkiemassine
    aelhkies+A+Superl+Pl+Ela: aelhkiemassijste
    aelhkies+A+Superl+Pl+Com: aelhkiemassigujmie
    aelhkies+A+Superl+Ess: aelhkiemassine

  Verb - båetedh: # verb I, stem -ie, root vowel -åe-
    båetedh+V+IV+Inf: båetedh
    båetedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: båatam
    båetedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: båatah
    båetedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: båata
    båetedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du1: båetien
    båetedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du2: [båeteden, båetiejidien]
    båetedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du3: båetiejægan
    båetedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [båetebe, båetiejibie]
    båetedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [båetede, båetiejidie]
    båetedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: båetieh
    båetedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [båetiejim, böötim]
    båetedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [båetiejih, böötih]
    båetedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [båetieji, bööti]
    båetedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1: [båetiejimen, böötimen]
    båetedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du2: [båetiejiden, böötiden]
    båetedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: [båetiejigan, böötigan]
    båetedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [båetiejimh, böötimh]
    båetedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [båetiejidh, böötidh]
    båetedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [båetiejin, böötin]
    båetedh+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: båetieh
    båetedh+V+IV+Imprt+Du2: båeteden
    båetedh+V+IV+Imprt+Pl2: båetede
    båetedh+V+IV+ConNeg: båetieh
    båetedh+V+IV+Ger: båetieminie
    båetedh+V+IV+PrfPrc: båateme
    båetedh+V+IV+VGen: båetien
